Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 6. Miscellaneous and General Provisions.

Sec. 44.83.900.
Annual audit.

The authority shall have its financial records audited annually by a certified public accountant.
The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the authority and shall have access to these records at any time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.190. Renumbered as AS

44.83.190

in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.910.
Limitations on issuance of bonds by the authority.

The authority may not issue bonds except after 60 days notification of its intent to issue bonds is given to the governor and to the legislature, if the legislature is in session, or to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, if the legislature is not in session.

History.

(§ 24 ch 83 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.56.191. Renumbered as AS 44.83.191 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.920.
Insurance requirements in construction contracts.

In requesting bids and awarding construction contracts under this chapter the authority may not require a contractor to obtain workers’ compensation, general liability, or other required insurance from a particular insurer, agent, or broker and may not agree to provide insurance to a contractor who is awarded a construction contract.

History.

(§ 8 ch 89 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.83.192. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.930.
Operation of projects.

When a project is operated by the authority, the authority shall enter into one or more contracts for the sale of electrical power, energy, transmission capacity, or service from the project. Unless the contract is entered into under former AS

44.83.380

—

44.83.425

, a contract entered into under this section must meet all requirements of AS

44.83.090

.

[Repealed, § 27 ch 89 SLA 1983.]

[Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 24 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 9, 27 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 83 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 21 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.56.195. Renumbered as AS 44.83.195 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.940.
Annual report.

Before March 1 of each year, the authority shall submit to the governor a comprehensive report describing operations, income and expenditures for the preceding 12-month period. The authority shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 98 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.200. Renumbered as AS 44.83.200 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.950.
Appropriations and reports.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the authority is subject to the provisions of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

The authority shall, by the 15th day of each regular legislative session, prepare a report detailing project status, original costs, and projected costs, particularly highlighting any costs in excess of the original cost estimates submitted for each project when that project was originally approved by the legislature. The authority shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 99 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.210. Renumbered as AS 44.83.210 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 44.83.960.
Long-term energy plan. [Repealed, § 16 ch 134 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.83.970.
Public records; open meetings.

The provisions of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

and AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act) apply to the authority.
The authority shall publish a proposed agenda of its meetings and afford the public an opportunity to be heard in accordance with AS

44.62.312

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.220. Renumbered as AS 44.83.220 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 44.83.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“authority” means the Alaska Energy Authority established by this chapter;

“bonds” means bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority issued under this chapter;

“feasibility study”

means a study conducted for the purpose of establishing the economic and environmental practicality of completing a proposed power project;

includes engineering and design work to meet the requirements for submission of a license application for a proposed new project to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;

“person” includes a public agency in addition to the entities set out in AS

01.10.060(a)(8)

;

“power” includes any and all electrical energy generated, distributed, bought, or sold for purposes of lighting, heating, power, and every other useful purpose;

“power project” or “project” means a plant, works, system, or facility, together with related or necessary facilities and appurtenances, including a divided or undivided interest in or a right to the capacity of a power project or project, that is used or is useful for the purpose of

electrical or thermal energy production;

waste energy utilization and energy conservation; or

transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, and interchange of electrical or thermal energy, including district heating or interties;

“public agency” means any city or other municipal corporation, political subdivision, governmental unit, or public corporation created by or under the laws of this state or of another state of the United States, and any state or the United States, and any person, board, or other body declared by the laws of any state or the United States to be a department, agency, or instrumentality of them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am §§ 21, 22 ch 156 SLA 1978; am §§ 26, 27 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 10, 11 ch 133 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 75 § 3 (1989); am §§ 22, 28 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 78 SLA 1998; am § 19 ch 83 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 6 FSSLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.230. Renumbered as AS 44.83.230 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989, and reorganized to alphabetize the defined terms.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (6)(A), deleted “other than nuclear energy production” following “electrical or thermal energy production”.

The 2011 amendment, effective July 14, 2011, deleted “under former AS 44.83.181” from the end of (3)(A).

Sec. 44.83.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Energy Authority Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.240. Renumbered as AS 44.83.240 in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

In 1989, the revisor of statutes substituted “Alaska Energy Authority” for “Alaska Power Authority” in accordance with E.O. 75, § 8 (1989).